Arkansas, session 2025, HB1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1202(7), concerning the definition of
"health insurer" under the Healthcare Contracting Simplification Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(7)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that is subject to
state insurance regulation and provides or administers health insurance in
this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes:
(i) An insurance company;
(ii) A health maintenance organization;
(iii) A hospital and medical service corporation;
(iv) A risk-based provider organization;
(v) A sponsor of a nonfederal self-funded
governmental plan; and
(vi) A dental-only plan; and
*ANS074*
04-01-2025 14:27:51 ANS074

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H4/1/25 HB1426
(vii) A third-party administrator or other entity
acting on behalf of a self-insured health benefit plan;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1203(a), concerning the prohibited
activities under the Healthcare Contracting Simplification Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, a
contracting entity shall not:
(1) Offer to a healthcare provider a healthcare contract that
includes an all-products clause;
(2) Enter into a healthcare contract with a healthcare provider
that includes an all-products clause; or
(3) Amend or renew an existing healthcare contract previously
entered into with a healthcare provider so that the healthcare contract as
amended or renewed adds or continues to include an all-products clause; or
(4) Enforce a stipulation, requirement, or policy that has the
effect of an all-products clause whether or not an all-products clause is
included in the healthcare contract.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1210 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1210. Healthcare contract or provider network — Prohibition.
(a) A healthcare insurer contracting entity shall not:
(1) Lease, rent, or sell a healthcare contract or provider
network of a health benefit plan to another contracting entity, healthcare
insurer, or third-party administrator; or
(2) In any manner allow the use of a healthcare contract or
provider network of a health benefit plan by another contracting entity,
healthcare insurer, or third-party administrator.
(b)(1) A violation of this section is:
(A) An unfair trade practice under § 23-66-206; and
(B) Subject to the Trade Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et
seq.
(2) If a healthcare contract contains a provision that violates
this section, then the provision under the healthcare contract is void.
(c) This section does not apply if:
(1) a healthcare insurer: A contracting entity is a dental-only
04-01-2025 14:27:51 ANS074

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H4/1/25 HB1426
plan and
(1) Grants grants access to the healthcare insurer's contracting
entity's provider network or healthcare contract to another healthcare
insurer or entity that is:
(A) An affiliate of the healthcare insurer; or
(B) Operating according to the same brand licensee program
as the healthcare insurer; or
(2) A contracting entity:
(2)(A) Provides notice of the intent to lease, rent, or
sell a healthcare contract or provider network of a health benefit plan to
another healthcare insurer or third-party administrator;
(3)(B) Allows a healthcare provider that is a party to the
healthcare contract or provider network of a health benefit plan the
opportunity to opt out of participating in the:
(A)(i) Proposed lease, rental, or sale of a
healthcare contract or provider network of a health benefit plan entirely
upon the execution or renewal of the healthcare contract; and
(B)(ii) Lease, rental, or sale of a healthcare
contract with respect to an individual contracting entity, healthcare
insurer, or third-party administrator upon notice that the individual
contracting entity, healthcare insurer, or third-party administrator has
violated the terms of the healthcare contract; and
(4)(C) Provides contact information for the healthcare
insurer or third-party administrator using the healthcare contract or
provider network of a health benefit plan, including without limitation:
(A)(i) Contact name;
(B)(ii) Mailing address;
(C)(iii) Direct telephone number for customer
service matters; and
(D)(iv) Direct email address for customer service
matters.
(d) Subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section does not apply if a
contracting entity grants access to the contracting entity's provider network
or healthcare contract to another healthcare insurer or contracting entity
that is:
(1) An affiliate of the healthcare insurer; or
04-01-2025 14:27:51 ANS074

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H4/1/25 HB1426
(2) Operating according to the same brand licensee program as
the healthcare insurer.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-99-1211. Waiver prohibited.
(a) This subchapter shall not be waived by contract.
(b) A contractual arrangement or action taken in conflict with this
subchapter or that purports to waive a requirement of this subchapter is
void.

/s/L. Johnson
























04-01-2025 14:27:51 ANS074